Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0416

Action without a meeting.

(1) Unless the organic rules require that action be taken only at a members meeting, any action that may be taken by the members may be taken without a meeting if the action is approved by members entitled to vote on the action in the aggregate not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to approve that action at a meeting of which all members entitled to vote on the action were present and voted. Action may be approved by members without a meeting or a vote by means of execution of a single consent or multiple consents in a record to the action.

(2) Consent under subsection (1) of this section may be withdrawn by a member in a record at any time before the limited cooperative association receives a consent from each member entitled to vote.

(3) Consent to any action may specify the effective date or time of the action.

[ 2019 c 37 s 416.]